Washington statutes.
RCW 5.24.050

Jurisdictions excepted.

The law of any jurisdiction other than a state, territory or other jurisdiction of the United States shall be an issue for the court, but shall not be subject to the foregoing provisions concerning judicial notice.

[ 1941 c 82 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 1282.]